Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 12.31, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Declaration of peacetime emergency. (a) The governor may declare a peacetime emergency. A peacetime declaration of emergency may be declared only when any of the following endangers life and property and local government resources are inadequate to handle the situation: (1) an act of nature; (2) a technological failure or malfunction; (3) a terrorist incident; (4) a cyber attack, including a physical or electronic attack on the state's information and telecommunications technology infrastructure, systems, or services; (5) an industrial accident; (6) a hazardous materials accident; or (7) a civil disturbance. If the peacetime emergency occurs on Indian lands, the governor or state director of emergency management deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end consult with tribal authorities before the governor makes such a declaration. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the governor's authority to act without such consultation when the situation calls for prompt and timely action. When the governor declares a peacetime emergency, the governor must immediately notify the majority and minority leaders of the senate and the speaker and majority and minority leaders of the house of representatives. A peacetime emergency must not be continued for more than five days unless extended by resolution of the Executive Council new text begin for new text end up tonew text begin an additional 25 days for a cumulative total ofnew text end 30 days. An order, or proclamation declaring, continuing, or terminating an emergency must be given prompt and general publicity and filed with the secretary of state. (b)new text begin The governor must not extend a peacetime emergency beyond the 30 days provided in paragraph (a) unless the extension is approvednew text end by majority vote of each house of the legislaturedeleted text begin , the legislature may terminate a peacetime emergency extending beyond 30 daysdeleted text end .new text begin The governor may make additional proposals to extend the peacetime emergency, and the legislature may, by majority vote of each house, extend the peacetime emergency for up to an additional 30 days per proposal.new text end If the governor determines a need to extend the peacetime emergency declaration beyond 30 daysnew text begin or beyond a peacetime emergency declaration extended by up to 30 days by the legislature under this paragraphnew text end and the legislature is not sitting in session, the governor mustnew text begin provide at least three days' notice to the majority and minority leaders in both houses of the legislature of the governor's intent tonew text end issue a call immediately convening both houses of the legislature. Nothing in this section limits the governor's authority over or command of the National Guard as described in the Military Code, chapters 190 to 192A, and required by the Minnesota Constitution, article V, section 3. new text begin (c) The governor must not allow a peacetime emergency declaration to expire and declare a new peacetime emergency for the same emergency in an effort to avoid obtaining legislative approval for an extension of a peacetime emergency as provided under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (d) If a peacetime emergency declaration is in effect under this subdivision and the governor determines the need to declare an additional, separate peacetime emergency in response to a different event than the event for which the first emergency was declared, the governor is not required to make an additional declaration under this subdivision for the subsequent peacetime emergency except for purposes of receiving federal aid under section 12.22. A subsequent peacetime emergency declared under this paragraph is effective for the duration of the previous peacetime emergency declaration. An extension of either the previous or subsequent peacetime emergency declaration, or both, under this paragraph is subject to legislative approval as required in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end